Utah statutes.
30-1-39.   Violation of counseling provisions -- Misdemeanor.

Any person coming within the provisions of this act who falsely represents that he has complied with the requirements of a master plan for premarital counseling or who, for the purpose of evading the provisions of this act, applies for a marriage license in a county within the state of Utah which does not require premarital counseling, is guilty of a misdemeanor.



Enacted by Chapter 64, 1971 General Session

